Massachusetts, session 194th, H437.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 12 of chapter 138 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by striking out, in lines 79 to 81, inclusive, the words “, notwithstanding any limitation
on the number of licenses the city or town is authorized to grant in section 17,” and inserting in
place thereof the following words:- pursuant to the municipal plan as required by section 17

SECTION 2. Said section 12 of said chapter 138, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by striking out, in lines 107 to 109, inclusive, the words “and irrespective of any
limitation of number of licenses contained in section seventeen”.

of 6

SECTION 3. The sixth paragraph of said section 12 of said chapter 138, as so appearing,
is hereby amended by striking out the second sentence.
SECTION 4. Said section 12 of said chapter 138, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting after the word “antemeridian”, in lines 150 and 155, each time it appears,
the following words:- , except in a city or town that is serviced by the Massachusetts Bay
Transportation Authority’s late-night service as authorized by chapter 161A if the local
governing body of such city or town accepts this provision.
SECTION 5. Said section 12 of said chapter 138, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by adding the following 4 paragraphs:-
All licenses issued under this section pursuant to a new license application that is filed
after July 1, 2016 shall be non-transferable and a licensing authority shall not approve the
transfer of such license.
If the license granted under this section is cancelled, revoked or no longer in use by the
license holder, the license shall be returned physically, with all of the legal rights, privileges and
restrictions pertaining thereto to the licensing authority.
If a license holder closes or terminates the license holder’s business, or sells or transfers
the license holder’s business, the license holder shall return the license physically, with all of the
legal rights, privileges and restrictions pertaining thereto to the licensing authority. The
licensing authority may then in its discretion grant a license to a qualified new applicant at a
different location according to the standard for a new license.

of 6

A license may be re-issued by the licensing authority at the same location only if an
applicant for the license files with the local licensing authority a letter from the department of
revenue and any applicable government agency indicating that the license is in good standing
with the department and agency and that all applicable taxes, payments, assessments and
contributions for unemployment and health insurance have been paid. If a license is granted
under this section then cancelled, revoked or no longer in use, and then re-issued to a new
applicant at the same location and the prior license holder at that location was reported as
delinquent as specified in section 25, the name of the new license applicant shall appear in the
place and stead of the former license holder, as of the date of the new license being issued, unless
the alcoholic beverages control commission otherwise orders in writing, for good cause, after a
hearing with notice to all parties.

SECTION 6. The first paragraph of section 14 of said chapter 138, as so appearing, is
hereby amended by striking out the first sentence and inserting in place thereof the following
sentence:- Special licenses for the sale of all alcoholic beverages or wine and malt beverages
only, or any of them, may be issued, as determined by the municipality, by the local licensing
authorities to the responsible manager of any indoor or outdoor activity or enterprise or to the
responsible manager of any nonprofit organization conducting any indoor or outdoor activity or
enterprise.

of 6

SECTION 7. Section 16A of said chapter 138, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking out, in line 12, the word “so” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- as
determined by a municipality to be.

SECTION 8. Said section 16A of said chapter 138, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by striking out, in lines 15 and 16, the words “, to the extent that the same are issuable
under section seventeen”.

SECTION 9. Said section 16A of said chapter 138, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by striking out, in line 19, the words “for the purposes of section seventeen”.

SECTION 10. Section 17 of said chapter 138, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking out the introductory paragraph and the first 6 paragraphs and inserting in place thereof
the following 3 paragraphs:-

Section 17. A city or town shall determine the number of all alcoholic beverage or wines
and malt beverage licenses to be issued by its local licensing authority under sections 12, 14 and
15F, including the number of seasonal licenses; provided, that for licenses issued under section
15, cities and towns may grant 1 such license for each population unit of 5,000 or any additional
fraction thereof but may, regardless of population, grant at least 2 licenses under section 15.
of 6


A city or town that seeks to grant additional licenses on or after January 1, 2018 shall
adopt a plan that is approved by the mayor, city council or board of selectmen. The plan shall
determine the process for granting additional licenses; provided, however, that: (i) at least 1
public hearing regarding the plan shall be conducted by the city council, board of selectmen or
governing body of the city or town; and (ii) the city or town shall notify the alcoholic beverages
control commission of the public hearing.

The governing body of each city or town shall hold a public hearing regarding a license
application within 30 days of the date of the license application.

SECTION 11. Sections 17A to 17C, inclusive, of said chapter 138, as so appearing, are
hereby repealed.

SECTION 12. Section 29 of said chapter 138, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking out, in lines 22 to 24, inclusive, the words “; but a license issued to a registered
pharmacist under said section shall be included in computing the number of licenses that may be
granted in any city or town as provided in section seventeen”.

of 6

SECTION 13. Sections 3, 6, and 10 of chapter 193 of the acts of 2011 are hereby
repealed.
SECTION 14. On or after January 1, 2018, the number of licenses then authorized under
section 17 of chapter 138 of the General Laws shall continue unless changed by the governing
body of a city or town under said section 17 of said chapter 138
of 6